venv/lib/python3.10/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_id_ID.dic
ISO8859-1
a1a
a1a2t1
a1bad
a1ba1di1
a1bah
a1ba3h2a2n1
aba1ha
a1bai1
a1ba1i2k1
a1bai1ma1na
abai1ma
abai1ma2n1
a1bar
a1bar1an
aba1r2a
a1ba2t1
a1ba3t2o1ar
aba1to
abato1a
ab1das
ab1d
ab1d2i1
ab1d2o
ab1d2u
a1be
a1be1r2a3s2i
aber1
abe1r2a
abe1r2as1
a1bi
a2b1ja2d1
ab1j
a2b1ja3d2i1ah
abja1di1
abjadi1a
ab1l
ab1le1p
a1bo
ab1r
ab3r4a
ab1ro1s2fer
abros1f
ab1s
ab1sa2h1
ab1se2n1
abse1
ab1se2s1
ab1so2r1ben
abso1r1
absor1b
ab1so2r2p1si
abso2r2p1
absorp1s
ab1stai2n1
abs1t
absta
abstai
ab1st1r2ak
ab1str
ab1sur1d1
absu
absu1r1
a1bu
a1bu1an
abu1a
a1bu2h1
a1bu2n2g3
a1ca
a1cah1
a1ca2k1
a1can1
a1can2g1
a1ca2p1
a1ca1ra
a1ca1ra1k1a2n1
aca3r2a2k1
aca3r3a3k2a
a1ce
a1ci
a1co
a1cu
a1cu2h1
a1cu2m1
a1da
a1da2b1
a1dak1s
a1da1la2h1
ada1la1
a1da2t1
a1de
a1de1ga2n1
ade1ga
a1di
1adi2l1
a1do
ado2n1
a1dop1si
adop1s
a1du
a1du2k1
a1du2n1
a1du2n2g1
a1du3n2ya
aduny
a1e
a2e1ro1
a2e1ro2b
a2e1ro3ba
a2e1ro3bik
aero1bi
a1fa
a1fe
a1fi
a1fik2s
a1fo
a1fu
a1ga
a1ga1ma1
a1ge
a1ge2n1
a1gen1da1k2a2n1
agen1d
agen1da2k1
agen1da
agenda1ka
a1ge3n2e1
a1ge2n2s
a1gi
a1gi2h1
a1go
ag1r
ag1ra
a1g2ram
ag1re1
ag1re1si
ag1r2es
ag1re1si2f1
ag1re2s1tal
agres1t
agresta
ag1ro1
ag1ro1no1mi
agron1
ag2r2o1n2o
ag1ro2s1
a1gu
a1gul
.a1gun1an
.a1gu
.agu1na
a1gu2n2g1
a1ha
a1ha1m2i211
aham1
aha1mi
a1he
a1hi
a1hi2r1
a1ho
a1hu
ai
a1i2b1
a1i2r1
a1it
a2i1tam
ai1ta
a1ja
a1ja1i2b1
ajai
a1ja2k1
a1ja2m1
a1ja3m2u
a1ja2r1
a1je
a1ji
a1jo
a1ju
a1ka
a1ka2i
a1ka3id
a1ka2l1
a1ka3l2a
a1ka2n1
a1ka2n2g1
a1ka3n2ya1
akany
a1ka2r1
a1ka3r2a2n2g1
aka1ra
a1ka2s1
a1ka3s2i
a1ke1
1a1khi2r1
a1khi3r2at
akhira
a1khi3r2u
a1khi3r2u1sa1
akhi1ru2s1
a1ki
ak1l
ak3la
ak1li1
a1ko
a1ko1mo1
a1k1r
a2k1ra2b1
a2k1re1
a2k1re1di1ta1
ak2re1dit
akre1di
a2k2ri1
a2k1ri2f
a3k2ri1t
a2k1ro1
a2k1ro1ni2m1
akron1
ak1ro1n2i
ak1s
ak1sa3r4a
ak1se1
ak1se2n
ak1se2p1
ak1se2s
ak1se3so1
ak1t
ak1ti2f1
ak1tu1a
ak1tu1a2l1
ak1tu1a3l2i1
a1ku
a1ku1a
a1ku1a1tik
aku1a2t1
akua1ti
a1ku1pu
a1ku1pun1k1
aku1pun1
a1ku2r1
a1ku3r2a
a1ku4r3an
a1ku5r4a2n2g1
a1ku2r1i
a1ku3r2i1k
a1ku1sa
a1ku1sa1tif
aku1sa2t1
akusa1ti
a1la
a1la2h1
a1la2i1
a1la1mah
ala1ma
a1la1mak
a1la2m1an1
a1la3m2an1da
alaman1d
a1la1mas
a1la1ma2t1
a1la1ma1t2ul
alama1tu
a1la1m1i
a1la1m2i1ah
alami1a
a1la1m2in
a1la2m3i1nya
alaminy
a1la2n2g1
a1la2p1
a1la3p2e
a1la2r1
a1la2r2m
a1la2s1
a1la2s3i
a1la2t1
al1b
al1ba1
al1ba2s
a1le
a1le1gro
a1le1man
ale1ma1
al1f
al1fa
al1fe
al1fu
a1li
a1li1e
ali1fa
ali2f1an
ali2h1
ali2m1a2n1
alim
ali1ma1
ali3m2a2n1t
a1li1ne1a
ali1ne
a1li2n2g1
a1li3ng2u
a1li2p1
a1li3p2un1
ali1pu
a1li2r3
al1ja1
al1j
al1ju
al1l2a2h1
al1l
al1l2a3h2u
a1lo
al1t
al1ta2s1i
alta
altas1
al1to1st2ra
altos1t
a1lu
alun1an
alu1na
a1lu2p1
a1lu1r1
a1ma
a1ma1bak1
a1m2ag
a1mal1an
ama1la
a1mal1ga2m1
amal1g
a1mal1ga3m2a1si
a1malga1ma
a1mal1ga3m2a3t2or1
amalga1mat1
amalga1ma1t2o
a1ma1l1i
a1ma1l2i1ah
amali1a
a1ma2n1an
ama1na
a1ma3n2a2t1
a1ma2n2g1
a1ma2r1an
ama1ra
a1mat1
a1ma1t2a
a1ma2t3a2n
ama1t2i1r2
ama1ti
ama1t2ir1i2s1me
amati1r2i2s1
amatiris1m
a1ma1t2o
am1b
am1ba2h1
a2m1ba2i1
a2m1ba2i3kan
am1ba1i2k1
ambai1ka
am1ba2l1
am1ba3l2a2n2g1
amba1la
a2m1ba2n2g1
am1be2k1
a2m1bi2l1
a2m1bi3l2i
a2m1bi3l2i1ng2u
ambilin2g1
a2m1bi2n1
a2m1bi2n2g1
a2m1bi3n2ya
ambiny
a2m1b2las
amb1l
a2m1bru2k1
am1b1r
am1bu1lan2s
am1bu
ambul
ambu1la
ambu1la2n1
am1bu1la1to1ri1
ambu1la2t1
ambula1to
ambula3t2or1
am1bu2n2g3
am1bur1
am1bu1r2a1dul
ambu1ra
ambura1du
am1byar
amb1y
a1me
a1men1sa1l1i1
amen1s
amensal
a1me1ri1si1um
ame1ri
ame1ri2s1
ame1ri1si
amerisi1u
a1mi
1ami1n1i
ami1n2i1sa
a1mi1no
ami1rul1
amir1
1a1mi2t1
a1mo
am1p
a2m1pa2i1
am1pa2k1
a2m1pe1la2s3
ampe1la
am1pi2l1
a2m1plo2p1
am1p1l
a2m1prok
amp1r
amp2ro1
a2m1prun2g
a2m1pu
a2m1pu2h1
a2m1pu2n1
a2m1pu2t1
a2m1pu3t2a2s1i1
ampu1ta
amputas1
a1mu
1a1muk
1a1muk1an
amu1ka
a1na
a1na1ba
a2n1a1e1
a1na1f
a2n1a2f1r
a2na1g1l
a1na2h1
a1nai
a1na1i1n
a1na2k1
a1na3k2o
a1na3k2u
a1n2a1li
a1n2a1li1sa
a1n2a1li1si2s1
anali1si
a1n2a1log
ana1lo
a1n2a1lo1gi
a1na2m1
a1na2m1an
ana1ma1
a1na3m2or1f2o
ana1mo
anamor1f1
anamor1
a1na3m2u
a1na2s1
a1na3s2ir1
ana1si
an1ca
an1c
an1cai
an1ca2m1
an1can2g1
an1ca2p1
an1co1a
an1c2o
an1col
an1cuk
an1d
an1dai
an1dal1an
anda1la1
an1da1t2a2ng2a2n1
anda1ta
anda1t2a2n2g1
andat1an
andatang1a
an1de2r
an1de3ro
an1dro1
and1r
an1du2h1
a1ne
a1n2e2h1
a1n2e1ka
a1n2e2k1sa
anek1s
a1n2e2u1
a1n2e2u1plo1id
aneu1p2lo
aneup1l
aneuplo1i
an2g1
.a1ng2an1
.an2g1
.ang1a
ang1g
ang1ga2h1
ang1ga2l1
ang1ga2p1
ang1ga2r1
ang1ga3r2a
ang1ga4r3an
ang1ger1ka
angge1r
angger1k
ang1gi2t1
ang1gla2p1
angg1l
ang1go1ro1ka1si2h1
anggo1ro2k1
anggor1
anggo1ro
anggoro1ka
anggoroka1si
ang1gre2k1
ang1gu2k1
ang1gu2n1
an2g1gu2n2g1
ang1gu3n2ya
angguny
ang1gur1
a1ng2i2n1
ang1i
a1ng2i3n2a
a1ng2i4n3an
a1ngi1s3i
ang1k
ang1ka1ra
ang1ka2r1
ang3ka2t1
an2g1k2lun2g
angk1l
ang1ku2h1
ang1ku2t1
a1ngo1
a1ng2o1la
a1ngo2n1
a1ngo2p1
a1ng2o1r1
a1ngo2t1
ang1s
3ang1su2r1
angsu
a1ng2u1r1
a1ng2u1ru
a1ngut
a1ni
an1i1on
ani1o
an1i1ri1
ani1r1
an1i1se1i1
ani1se1
an1i1so
an1j
an1ja2k1
an1ja2l1
an1jlok
anj1l
an1ju2r1
a1no
a2n1or1
a2n2o1r2ak
ano1ra
a2n2o1r2ek
ano1re
an1t
an1ta1ke1
anta
an1t2a2n2g2an1
antan2g1
antang1a
an1ta1r2a1
an1ta2r3a2n
an1ta3r4a3nya1
antarany
an1ta3ri
an1ta3r2i2k1
an1te2p1
an1te1r2a
anter1
an1te1ro
an1ti2h1
an1ti3h2is1
anti1hi
an1ti2k1
an1ti3k2a
an1ti3k2li
antik1l
an1ti3k2lo
an1ti3k2o
an1ti3k2ri
anti1k1r
an1ti3k2u
an1ti3p
an1ti3pi1
an1ti3pru1
antip1r
an1trak1s
an1t2r4a2k1
an1tro1
a1n2u
a1n2u1ge1ra2h1
anu1ge
anuge1r
anuge1ra
a1nu1li2r1
anul1i
a1nu2t1
a1nya1
any
a1nya2m1
a1ny2a1mu
a1nya2n2g1
a1nya2r
a1nyi2r1
a1o
a1pa
a1pak
ap1an
a1p2a1na1se1
apa1na
apa1na2s1
apany
a1par1te1men
apar1t
aparte1me
a3p2ar1te1me2n1i
a1par1to1tel
aparto1te
a1pe
a1pen1d
a1pen1dik1s
a1pi
a1pi2k1
a1pi3k2al
api1ka
a1pi2k2an
a1pi3k2u
a1pi2t1
a1pi3t2a
a1pi4t3an
ap1k
ap1ki2r1
ap1ki2r1an
apki3r4a1
ap1l
ap3la
ap3la1us
aplau
a3p2lo
ap3lu2s1
a1po
a1po1k2ri
apok1r
ap1r
ap3ri
ap3ron1
ap2ro1
a1pu
a1p2un2g1
a1pun1
a1pu2r1
a1qa
a1qe
a1qi
a1qo
a1qu
a1ra
a1ra2b1
a1ra3b2a1bu
ara1ba
a1ra3b2es
ara1be
a1ra3b2i
a1ra2h1
a1r2a1i
a1r2ak
a2r3a1k1a
a1ra1k1a2n1
a1r2a1na
a1ras
a1re
a1re1a
a1r2e1al
ar1g
a2r1gu
a1ri
a1ri2f1
a1ri3f2in
ari1fi
a1ri2s1
a1ri1te
a1ro1ma
a1ron1an
aron1
aro1n2a
ar1s
ar1si2p1
ar1sir1
ar1t
ar1ti1le1ri
arti1le
ar1tis
ar1tis1an
arti1sa
a1ru
a1ruk
a1rum1ba
arum
arum1b
a1sa
a1sa2h1
a1sa2k1
a1sa2l1an
asal
asa1la
a1sa2m1
a1sa2p1
a1sa2r1
a1se1
a1si
a1si1me2t1r
asi1me
a1si2n1
a1si2n2g1
a1si2n2g1an1
asi1ng2a
a1si3n2is
asi1ni
a1si3n2o
a1si3n2yor1
asiny
a1si1ri
asir1
a1sis1te2m
asis1t
a1sis1te2n1
as1k
as1ket
as2ke1
as1m
as1ma1ra
as1ma3r4a1ga
a1so
a1so1an
aso1a
a1so2r1ti
aso1r1
asor1t
as1p
as1pa2l1
as1pi1r1
as1pi1r2a1s2i
aspi1ra
aspi1r2a2s1
as1pi1ri2n
aspi1ri
as1p1r2ak
asp1r
as1t
as1ta3se1
asta
astas1
as1te1ro1id
aster1
aste1ro
aste1r2o1i
as1tro1na2u2t1
astron1
astro1n2a
astronau
as1tro1na2u1ti1ka
astrona2u3t2i
a1su
a1su2h1
a1su1ra
asu1r1
a1su3ran1si
asuran1s
a1syi2k1
asy
a1ta
a1tak
at1an
a1t2an2g1
a1ta1s1a
atas1
a1ta1se1
a1ta2s1i
a1te
a1te1nu
a1te1re2t1
ater1
a1ti
a1to
a3t2or1
at3ra
a1tren
a2t1ri
a2t1ri1bu
a2t1ri1bu2t1
at3ro
at3ro1p
a1tu
atu2r1
au
a1u2m1
au1ra
aur1
au1r2a2t1
a1u2t1
au3t2a
a1u4t3an
a2u3t2e
a2u3t2i
a2u3t2o1
a2u3t2o1k1r
a2u3t2o2p1si
autop1s
a1va
a1ve
a1vi
a1vo
a1vu
a1wa
a1wa2l1
a1wa2m1
a1wa3m2i
a1wa3m2u
a1wa1na1ma1
awa1na
awa1na2m1
a1wa2r1
a1wa3r2a1cu2n1
awa1ra
awara1cu
a1wa2s1
a1we
a1we2t1
a1wi
a1wo
a1wu
a1wu2r1
a1wu2t1
a1ya
a1ya2h1
a1ya1i
a1yak
a1ya1k1a2n1
aya1ka
a1ya2l1
a1ya3l2a2h1
aya1la
a1ya2m1
a1ya3m2u
a1ya2p1
a1ya3p2a1d
aya1pa
a1yar1
a1ye
a1yi
a1yo
a1yo2m1
a1yu
a1yu2m1
a1yu2n1
a1yu2n2g
a1yu2t1
a1za
a1za1li
a1za2m1
a1ze
a1zi
a1zo
a1zu
ba1ba
ba1ba2k1
ba1ba2l1
ba1ba2t1
ba1bi
ba1bi2l1
bab1la2s1
bab1l
ba1ca1
ba1ca2h1
ba1ca2k1
ba1ca3k2a2n1
baca1ka
ba1ca2n2g1
ba1can1
ba1ca2r1
ba1co2k1
ba1co
ba1cot
ba1da
ba1dai
ba1da2n1
ba1dan2g1
ba1da3n2i
ba1do
ba1don2g
bado2n1
ba1ga
ba1gai1ma1na1
bagai
bagai1ma
bagai1ma2n1
ba1gai1ma1na1kah1
bagaima1na1ka
bagaima1na2k1
ba1gu
ba1gu2s1
ba1ha
ba1ha1m2a
baham1
ba3h2a2n1
ba3h2a3n2a
ba3h2a4n3an
ba3h2a4n2g1
ba1has
ba3h2a1sa
ba1ha3s2a1m2u
baha1sa2m1
ba1ha2s1an
ba1ha3s2a1nya1
bahasany
ba1ha1ya1
ba1he
ba1he1u
bah1te1r2a
bah1t
bahter1
ba1id
bai
ba2i1du
bai1du1r2i
bai1du2r3
1ba1i2k1
ba1in
ba2i1nah
bai1na
ba1is
ba1i2t1
ba2i3t2ul
bai1tu
ba1ja1
ba1ja2j
ba1ja2n
ba1ja2u
ba1ji
ba1ji2k1
ba1ka
ba1ka2r1
ba1ka2t1
ba1ke1
ba1khil
ba1ki
ba1ki1r1
bak1t
bak1te1r2i1
bakter1
ba1la
ba1lai1run2g
ba1la2i1
bala1i2r1
ba1la2k1
ba1la2p1
ba1la1ten
ba1la2t1
bala1te
ba1li
ba3l2i2k1an
bali1ka
ba1li2k1i
ba1lis1tik
balis1t
ba1lis1ti1ka
ba1lo
ba1lo2k1
ba1lu
ba1lu2h1
ba1lu2i1
ba1lu2t1
ban1ca2k1
ban1ca
ban1c
ban1ca2r1
ban1ce2t1
ban1c2i
ban1cu2h1
ban1cu2t1
ban1d
ban1da2r1
ban1da3r2a
ban1da4r3an
ban1de1la
ban1de1ri4n2g1
ban1de2r
banderi
ban1di2t1
ban1du2l1
ban2g1
.ba1ng1an1
.ban2g1
.bang1a
ba1ng1ar
bang1a
ba1ng2as
ba1ng2at
ba1ng2au
ba1ng2e1t1
bange
ban2g1ga1
bang1g
ban2g1ga2n
ban2g1ga3nya1
bangga1ny
1bang1i
1ba1ng2i2n1
ba1ng2ir1
.ba2ng1k
bangka2i
bang1k
bangka2s1
bang1ki2r1
bang1ki2t1
bangko2t1an
bangko1t2a1
bang1kru2t1
bangk1r
ba1ngo1
ba1ng2o1r1
ba1ng2un1
ba1ng2un1an
bangu1na
ba1ngus
ba1ni
ba3n2i1r1
ban1j
ban1ja4r1an
ban1ja3r4a
ban2k1
ban3k2i2r1
ban1t
ban1ta2h1
banta
ban1tai
ban1ta2l1
ban1ta2r1
ban1ta2r3a2n
ban1ta1r2a1
ban1tu2n1
ban1tu3n2ya
bantuny
ba1ny
ba1nya2k1
ba1nya1
ba1nyo2l1
ba1pa1
ba1pa2k1
ba1pa3k2u
ba1pa2n1da
bap1an
bapan1d
ba1pa2n2g1
ba1pa1nya1
bapany
bap1ti2s1
bap1t
ba1r2a
ba1r2a1i
ba2r3a1k2a
ba1r2ak
ba1r2a2n2g1
ba1r2ang1ka1li1
barang1k
ba1ra2t1
bar1b
bar1ba2r1
bar1ba4r3i2s1
barba1ri
ba1ri
ba1ri4n2g1
ba3r2i2s1
ba1ro
ba1ro1s2kop
baros1k
ba1ru
ba1ru2s1
ba1ru2t1
ba1sa
ba1sa1l1i1
basal
ba1si
ba3sit
ba1ta
ba1ta2l
ba1ta3li1on
bata1li
batali1o
ba5t4a2n2g1
bat1an
ba1t2a2ng2an1
batang1a
ba1ti
ba3t2i2k1
ba1ti2n1
ba1ti1p1l
ba1ti1r2
ba2t1ros
bat3ro
bau
ba1ud
ba1uk
ba2uk1sit
bauk1s
ba1u2n1
ba1u2n2g
ba2u3n2ya
bauny
ba1u2r1
ba1u3r2ek1sa
bau1re
baurek1s
ba1u1s
ba1u1su1ku
bau1su
bau1su2k1
ba1wa
ba1wa2h1
ba1wa1la2h1
ba1wa2l1
bawa1la
ba1wa2n2g1
ba1ya
ba1ya2r1
ba1yu
ba1yu2n2g
ba1yu2n1
b1b
b1c
b1d
be1be
be1b
be1be2k1is
bebe1ki
be1be2r1
be1be3r2as1
be1be1r2a
be1bo
be1bo1do2r3an
bebo1do
bebo1do2r1
bebodo1ra
be1ca2k1
be1ca
be1da
be1da2k1
be1da3k2a2n1
beda1ka
be1di2l1
be1di
be1din
be1do
be1do2l1
be1ga
be1ga2l1
be1ga1na
be1ga2n1
be1i
be1ka
be1ka2l1
be1ka1t2ul
be1kat1
beka1t2u
be1ku
be1ku3k2an
be1ku2k1
beku1ka
be1ku1ku
be1la
be1la1da
be1la2h1
be1la3h2ak
bela1ha
be1la3h2i
be1la3h2on2g
bela1ho
be1lai
be1la1la2k1
bela1la
be1la1ng1a
be1lan1
be1la2n2g1
be1la2n1ja1
be1lan1j
be1la2s1
be1la3s2un2g1
bela1su
belasun
be1le
be1le2k1
be1le2k1a2n1
bele1ka
be1le3k2e2k
bele1ke1
be1le3k2ok
bele1ko
be1le1r
be1li
be1li2k1
be1li3k2at
beli1ka
be1li3k2u
be1lo
be1lo2k1
be1lo3k2ok
belo1ko
be1lon
be1lo2t1
be1lo3t2o2n2g3
be1lo1to
be1lu
be1lu2r1
be1lu3r2u
be1na
be1na2h1
be1na2m1an
bena1ma1
be1na2r1
be1na3r2a
be1na4r3an
ben1c
ben1ca1na
ben1ca1na1i
ben1d
ben1de3ra
bende1r
ben1de3r2a1i
ben1di1r1
ben1do1ro
bendor1
ben1dun2g1
ben1du
be1ngal
beng1a
ben2g
be1n2gan2g1
beng1an1
be1ng2a1wa2n1
beng1a1wa
be1ngek
be1ng2e
be1ng2e1p
be1ngi2s1
beng1i
beng1k
beng1ka2h1
beng1ka2k1
beng1ka1r2ak1
beng1ka2r1
beng1ka1ra
beng1ka1tak1
beng3ka2t1
bengka1t2a
beng1ke2l1
bengke1
beng1ke3l2ai
bengke1la
beng1ko2k1
be1ngoh
bengo
be1n2gon2g
be3ng2o2n1
be1ng1u
be1ngu2t1
be1ni
be1ni2h1
ben1jo2l1
ben1j
ben1jut
be2n1t
ben1ta2k1
be2n1ta
ben1ta1la
be2n1ta2l1
ben1ta2n2g1
ben1ta3ng2u1r1
ben1ta2r1
ben1ta3r2a
ben1ta4r3an
ben1tro2k1
ben1tu2k1
ben1tu2r1
be1nu
be1nu1a
be1nu1a1ron1
be1nu2m1
ber1
be1r2a
be2r3a1b
be3r4a1be
be2r3a1d
be2r3a1f
be2ra1ga
be2r3a1gah
be2r3a1gak
be3r2a1ga2m1
be4r3a3ga3m2a1
be3ra1gan
be2r3a1go1
be1r2ak
be2r3a1ka
be3r4a3k2a2h1
be2r3a3ku
be2r3a2l1
be2r3a3m2a2l1
be1ra2m1
be1ra3m2a
be2r2a2m1ba2i1
be1r2am1b
be2r3a2m1bau
be2r3a2m1bi
be2r3a1n
be3r4a2n1da
beran1d
be3r4a2n2g1
be4r4a2ng1an1
berang1a
be5r4a3ng2as
be4r5a2ng1g
be4r5a3ng2i
be4r5a2ng1ka
berang1k
be5r6a2ng1kal
be5r6a2ng1kan
be5r6a2ng3ka2t1
be4r5a2ng1s
be5r6a2ng1sa
be3r4a1ni1
be2r3a2n1j
be3r4a2n1t
be3r4a2n1ta2s1
be1ran1ta
be1rap
be2r3a1pi
be2r3a1r
be2r3a2r1t
be1r2as1
be2r3a1s2a2l1
be1r2a3s2a1
be2r3a1s2a2p1
be2r3a1s2a2s1
be2r3as1ra1ma
beras1r
be1r2a2t1
be2r3a3t2a2p1
be1ra1ta
be1r2a3t2i
be2r3a3w2a2l1
bera1wa
be2r3a3w2a2n1
be2r3a3w2a2s1
be1r2e1del
bere1de
be1r2ek
